en: Weaving Shuttles
xx: Weaving Shuttles
cs: Tkalcovské člunky
da: Vævning – skytter
de: Webschützen
es: Lanzadera para tejer
fr: Navettes à tisser
it: Navette per telaio
ja: 杼
nl: Weefschuiten- en schietspoelen
no: Vevskytler
pl: Czółenka tkackie
pt: Lançadeiras
ru: Ткацкие челноки
sv: Skyttlar
tr: Dokuma Mekikleri

en: Craft Organization
xx: Craft Organization
cs: Hobby organizéry
da: Opbevaring af håndarbejsmaterialer
de: Aufbewahrung für Kunst- & Bastelmaterial
es: Organización de materiales de manualidades
fr: Rangements pour loisirs créatifs
it: Organizzazione delle attività creative
ja: クラフト整理用品
nl: Opbergsets voor handwerk
no: Håndverksorganisering
pl: Porządek w warsztacie
pt: Organizadores para artesanato
ru: Органайзеры для принадлежностей для рукоделия
sv: Hobbyförvaring
tr: El İşi Düzenleme

en: Needle\, Pin & Hook Organizers
xx: Needle\, Pin & Hook Organizers
cs: Organizéry na jehly\, špendlíky a háčky
da: Kasser til nåle\, stifter og kroge
de: Aufbewahrung für Näh-\, Strick- & Häkelnadeln
es: Organizadores de agujas\, alfileres y agujas curvas
fr: Rangements pour aiguilles\, épingles et crochets
it: Organizer per aghi\, spilli e uncinetti
ja: 針・ピン整理用品
nl: Opbergsets voor naalden\, pennen en haken
no: Organisering av nåler\, tegnestifter og kroker
pl: Organizery do igieł\, szpilek i szydełek
pt: Organizadores de agulhas\, ganchos e alfinetes
ru: Органайзеры для иголок\, булавок и крючков
sv: Stick-\, nål- och krokförvaring
tr: İğne\, Raptiye ve Kanca Düzenleyiciler

en: Sewing Baskets & Kits
xx: Sewing Baskets & Kits
cs: Sady pro šití a práci s textilem
da: Stof- og sykunstsæt
de: Arbeitssets für Näh- und Textilkunstarbeiten
es: Kits textiles y de costura
fr: Kits de couture et d'art textile
it: Kit per cucito e arti tessili
ja: 裁縫アート/テキスタイル アート用キット
nl: Naai- en textielhandwerksets
no: Sett til søm- og tekstilkunst
pl: Zestawy do szycia
pt: Kits de costura
ru: Наборы для шитья и текстильных работ
sv: Sybehör
tr: Dikiş ve Tekstil Sanatı Malzemeleri

en: Thread & Yarn Organizers
xx: Thread & Yarn Organizers
cs: Organizéry na nitě a příze
da: Kasser og stativer til tråd og garn
de: Aufbewahrung für Fäden & Garne
es: Organizadores de hilos y ovillos
fr: Rangements pour fil et laine
it: Organizer per filati
ja: 糸整理用品
nl: Opbergsets voor garens
no: Organisering av tråd og garn
pl: Organizery do nici i przędzy
pt: Organizadores de linhas e fios
ru: Органайзеры для пряжи и нитей
sv: Tråd- och garnförvaring
tr: İplik ve Yün Düzenleyiciler

en: Crafting Patterns & Molds
xx: Crafting Patterns & Molds
cs: Hobby vzory a formy
da: Skabeloner til håndarbejde
de: Muster & Formen für Kunstarbeiten
es: Moldes y patrones para manualidades
fr: Patrons et moules pour loisirs créatifs
it: Stampi e modelli per artigianato
ja: クラフトパターン・型
nl: Handwerkpatronen en -mallen
no: Mønstre og former
pl: Szablony i formy
pt: Fôrmas e modelos para artesanato
ru: Шаблоны и формы для рукоделия
sv: Hobbymönster och -formar
tr: El İşi Modelleri ve Kalıpları

en: Beading Patterns
xx: Beading Patterns
cs: Korálkové vzory
da: Perlemønstre
de: Vorlagen für Perlenarbeiten
es: Patrones para cuentas
fr: Modèles pour perles
it: Modelli per decorazioni con perline
ja: ビーズステッチ
nl: Kralenpatronen
no: Perlemønstre
pl: Wzory do koralików
pt: Moldes para contas
ru: Шаблоны для вышивки бисером
sv: Pärlmönster
tr: Boncuk İşi Modelleri

en: Craft Molds
xx: Craft Molds
cs: Formy na odlévání
da: Håndarbejdsforme
de: Gießformen
es: Moldes para artesanía
fr: Moules pour loisirs créatifs
it: Stampi per artigianato
ja: クラフト用型
nl: Hobbymallen
no: Håndarbeidsformer
pl: Formy rękodzielnicze
pt: Moldes para artesanato
ru: Формы для рукоделия и ремесёл
sv: Handarbetsformar
tr: El İşi Hazır Parçaları

en: Felting Molds
xx: Felting Molds
cs: Formy na filcování
da: Filteforme
de: Filzformen
es: Moldes para enfurtido
fr: Moules à feutrer
it: Stampi per feltratura
ja: 羊毛フェルト用型
nl: Viltmatrijzen
no: Filtformer
pl: Formy do filcowania
pt: Moldes de feltragem
ru: Формы для валяния
sv: Filtningsmallar
tr: Keçe Kalıpları

en: Needlecraft Patterns
xx: Needlecraft Patterns
cs: Vyšívací vzory
da: Skabeloner til syning
de: Stick-\, Strick- & Häkelmuster
es: Patrones de costura
fr: Patrons pour travaux d'aiguille
it: Modelli per cucito
ja: 刺繍パターン
nl: Handwerkpatronen
no: Broderimønstre
pl: Szablony do haftu na kanwie
pt: Modelos para bordado
ru: Шаблоны для вышивки
sv: Handarbetsmönster
tr: Nakış Modelleri

en: Sewing Patterns
xx: Sewing Patterns
cs: Vzory
da: Symønstre
de: Nähmuster
es: Patrones
fr: Patrons de couture
it: Modelli da cucire
ja: 裁縫用型紙
nl: Naaipatronen
no: Symønstre
pl: Wzory do szycia
pt: Padrões de costura
ru: Выкройки
sv: Symönster
tr: Dikiş Modelleri

en: Collectibles
xx: Collectibles
cs: Sběratelské předměty
da: Samleobjekter
de: Sammlerstücke
es: Coleccionables
fr: Articles de collection
it: Collezionismo
ja: コレクションアイテム
nl: Verzamelobjecten
no: Samlegjenstander
pl: Artykuły kolekcjonerskie
pt: Artigos colecionáveis
ru: Коллекционные предметы
sv: Samlarobjekt
tr: Koleksiyonlar

en: Autographs
xx: Autographs
cs: Autogramy
da: Autografer
de: Autogramme
es: Autógrafos
fr: Autographes
it: Autografi
ja: サイン入りグッズ
nl: Handtekeningen
no: Autografer
pl: Autografy
pt: Autógrafos
ru: Автографы
sv: Autografer
tr: İmzalar

en: Collectible Coins & Currency
xx: Collectible Coins & Currency
cs: Mince a peníze
da: Samleobjekter – mønter og pengesedler
de: Münzen & Währungen
es: Monedas y divisas
fr: Pièces de monnaie et devises à collectionner
it: Monete e banconote
ja: 記念コイン・記念硬貨
nl: Munten en valuta
no: Mynter og sedler med samleverdi
pl: Monety i waluty kolekcjonerskie
pt: Moedas colecionáveis
ru: Коллекционные монеты и банкноты
sv: Samlarmynt och valuta
tr: Koleksiyonluk Paralar

en: Collectible Banknotes
xx: Collectible Banknotes
cs: Sběratelské bankovky
da: Pengesedler
de: Sammlerbanknoten
es: Billetes coleccionables
fr: Billets de collection
it: Banconote da collezione
ja: 記念紙幣
nl: Verzamelbare bankbiljetten
no: Samlersedler
pl: Banknoty kolekcjonerskie
pt: Cédulas colecionáveis
ru: Коллекционные банкноты
sv: Samlarsedlar
tr: Koleksiyonluk Banknotlar

en: Collectible Coins
xx: Collectible Coins
cs: Sběratelské mince
da: Mønter
de: Sammlermünzen
es: Monedas coleccionables
fr: Pièces de collection
it: Monete da collezione
ja: 記念コイン
nl: Verzamelbare munten
no: Samlermynter
pl: Monety kolekcjonerskie
pt: Moedas raras
ru: Коллекционные монеты
sv: Samlarmynt
tr: Koleksiyonluk Madeni Paralar

en: Collectible Trading Cards
xx: Collectible Trading Cards
cs: Sběratelské karty
da: Samlekort
de: Sammelkarten
es: Cromos coleccionables
fr: Cartes à collectionner, Carte à collectionner, Vignette à collectionner
it: Carte collezionabili
ja: トレーディングカード
nl: Ruilkaarten
no: Samlekort
pl: Karty kolekcjonerskie
pt: Cartões colecionáveis
ru: Коллекционные карточки
sv: Samlarkort
tr: Koleksiyon Kartları

en: Collectible Weapons
xx: Collectible Weapons
cs: Sběratelské zbraně
da: Samlervåben
de: Sammlerwaffen
es: Armas coleccionables
fr: Armes de collection
it: Armi da collezione
ja: コレクション用武器
nl: Wapens voor verzamelaars
no: Samlevåpen
pl: Broń kolekcjonerska
pt: Armas colecionáveis
ru: Коллекционное оружие
sv: Samlarvapen
tr: Koleksiyonluk Silahlar

en: Collectible Guns
xx: Collectible Guns
cs: Sběratelské střelné zbraně
da: Replika og antikke skydevåben
de: Dekowaffen
es: Armas de coleccionismo
fr: Armes à feu de collection
it: Pistole da collezione
ja: コレクション用ガン
nl: Vuurwapens voor verzamelaars
no: Samleskytevåpen
pl: Pistolety i strzelby kolekcjonerskie
pt: Armas de colecionadores
ru: Коллекционные пистолеты и ружья
sv: Ej skjutbara samlarvapen
tr: Koleksiyonluk Tabancalar

en: Collectible Knives
xx: Collectible Knives
cs: Sběratelské nože
da: Samlerknive
de: Sammlermesser
es: Cuchillos coleccionables
fr: Couteaux de collection
it: Coltelli da collezione
ja: コレクション用ナイフ
nl: Messen voor verzamelaars
no: Samlekniver
pl: Noże kolekcjonerskie
pt: Facas colecionáveis
ru: Коллекционные ножи
sv: Samlarknivar
tr: Koleksiyonluk Bıçaklar